Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1402
Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center; created; purposes.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center under the supervision and control of the council. The purposes of the training center shall be to (1) test all law enforcement candidates on behalf of the council to ensure that they meet pre-certification and certification requirements, (2) oversee and monitor other training schools and training academies to ensure that pre-certification and certification requirements as set by the council are being met, and (3) conduct pre-certification programs, certification programs, and advanced law enforcement training programs as directed by the council.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 2, p. 2926;

Laws 1971, LB 929, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 3.